Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-255
Authority; bond issuance; state; no obligation; statement.

No bonds issued by the authority under the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act shall constitute a debt, liability, or general obligation of this state or a pledge of the faith and credit of this state but shall be payable solely as provided by section 58-254. Each bond issued under the act shall contain on the face of such bond a statement that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of this state is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bond.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 55;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 55.